Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Chapter 17. Emblements.

§ 55.1-1700.
Law of emblements.

In all cases, the right to emblements shall be as at common law, provided, however, that in any sale of land under a deed of trust or mortgage, such sale shall be made subject to the right and interest of a tenant in any crop planted by him under a bona fide lease for no more than one year, entered into by him with the mortgagor after the execution of such deed of trust or mortgage, but during such time as the mortgagor is allowed to remain in possession of the mortgaged premises and before the premises is advertised for sale under such deed of trust, or under an order in an action brought for the foreclosure of such deed of trust or mortgage.

History.

Code 1919, § 5540; 1928, p. 1146; 1938, p. 762; Code 1950, § 55-249; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For note on crops as personalty or realty in Virginia, see 39 Va. L. Rev. 1115 (1952).

§ 55.1-1701.
What rent tenant entitled to emblements to pay.

The tenant who is entitled to emblements, or his personal representative, shall pay a reasonable rent for the land occupied by the emblements in the same proportion as such land bears in quantity and value to the entire premises. Such rent shall be apportioned among the owners of the reversion, if there is more than one, according to their respective interests.

History.

Code 1919, § 5441; Code 1950, § 55-250; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1702.
Compensation to outgoing tenant for preparation of land for crop.

In the case of an outgoing tenant, those who succeed to the land shall pay such outgoing tenant reasonable compensation for any preparation of such land by the tenant for the purpose of planting a crop if the outgoing tenant, or his personal representative, would have been entitled to emblements had the crop been planted by him.

History.

Code 1919, § 5542; Code 1950, § 55-251; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1703.
Lessee of life tenant may hold land through end of year on death of tenant; apportionment of rent.

If there is a tenant for life or other uncertain interest in land that is leased to another, upon the death of such tenant for life or termination of such other uncertain interest, the lessee may hold the land through the end of the current year of the tenancy, paying rent. The rent, if it is reserved in money, shall be apportioned between the tenant for life or other uncertain interest, or his personal representative, and those who succeed to the land. If rent is reserved in kind, it shall be paid to the tenant for life or other uncertain interest, or his personal representative, and the tenant or his personal representative, as the case may be, shall pay to those who succeed to the land a reasonable rent, in money, from the expiration of the life estate or other uncertain interest to the end of the current year of the tenancy. The rent to be paid to those who succeed to the land shall be a charge in preference to other claims on the rent received in kind by such tenant or his personal representative.

History.

Code 1919, § 5543; Code 1950, § 55-252; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

; 11B M.J. Landlord and Tenant, § 16.